New York, session 2025-2026, S891.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 20 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. (a) The department shall establish a centralized homelessness 4 crisis response data system through which state agencies, local govern- 5 mental entities, including law enforcement agencies, court systems, 6 school districts, and emergency service providers, and other relevant 7 persons, as determined by the department, are able to share and access 8 information related to individuals who experience chronic homelessness 9 in order to connect or refer such individuals to services including 10 affordable housing opportunities. 11 (b) In developing such centralized homelessness crisis response data 12 system the department shall: 13 (i) consult with the entities described in paragraph (a) of this 14 subdivision to determine the challenges faced by such entities in 15 addressing chronic homelessness and how best to improve the response to 16 those challenges; and 17 (ii) enter into data sharing agreements as necessary for the exchange 18 of information relating to individuals experiencing chronic homelessness 19 through the centralized homelessness crisis response data system. 20 (c) The centralized homelessness crisis response data system estab- 21 lished under this section shall: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02279-01-5 S. 891 2 1 (i) to the extent permitted by a data sharing agreement, collect data 2 from other homeless crisis response systems maintained or operated by 3 other state entities; and 4 (ii) collect, aggregate, analyze and share homelessness information 5 submitted to the centralized homelessness crisis response data system 6 with entities that have access to the system pursuant to paragraph (a) 7 of this subdivision. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.